Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4078.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Legislative Service Bureau
from monies not otherwise appropriated from the ARPA Administrative
Costs Fund created in Section 255.5 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, the sum of Thirty-four Thousand Six Hundred Ninety-two
Dollars ($34,692.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to pay
obligations that may arise out of contracts during Fiscal Year 2027
related to the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Legislative Service Bureau
from monies not otherwise appropriated from the Statewide Recovery
Fund found in Section 255 of the Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
the sum of Two Hundred Thirteen Thousand Three Hundred Eight Dollars
($213,308.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to pay
obligations that may arise out of contracts during Fiscal Year 2027
related to the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021.

SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services from monies not otherwise appropriated from the
ARPA Administrative Costs Fund created in Section 255.5 of Title 62
of the Oklahoma Statutes, the sum of Eight Hundred Six Thousand
Sixty Dollars ($806,060.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary
to pay for expenses arising from implementing programs and
expenditures in accordance with actions taken by the Joint Committee
on Pandemic Relief Funding.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services from monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Statewide Recovery Fund found in Section 255 of the Title 68 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, the sum of One Million Six Hundred Twelve
Thousand One Hundred Twenty Dollars ($1,612,120.00) or so much
thereof as may be necessary to pay for expenses arising from
implementing programs and expenditures in accordance with actions
taken by the Joint Committee on Pandemic Relief Funding.
SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4078 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 21st day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 27th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 4078 Page 3